Wyoming, session 2025, SF0132.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 19-13-503 is created to read:
ARTICLE 5
PROTECTION OF CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE
19-13-503. Unlawful operation of unmanned aircraft
systems over critical infrastructure and systems
prohibited; permitted actions by law enforcement.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, no person shall operate or use an unmanned
aircraft system over or near critical infrastructure or a
critical system:
(i) To intentionally photograph critical
infrastructure or a critical system;
(ii) To intentionally loiter over or near
critical infrastructure or a critical system;
(iii) In furtherance of any other criminal
offense.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0132
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(b) Unless otherwise authorized by law, no person
shall operate or use an unmanned aircraft system or model
aircraft that is carrying, contains or is an explosive
device over or near critical infrastructure or a critical
system. This subsection shall not apply to law enforcement
and the military while acting in the course of their lawful
duties.
(c) This section shall not apply to:
(i) A person authorized by the federal aviation
administration to operate or use an unmanned aircraft
system if the person's operation or use complies with the
authorization granted or with rules promulgated by the
federal aviation administration;
(ii) A governmental entity's use of an unmanned
aircraft system owned by the governmental entity;
(iii) The use of an unmanned aircraft system by
the owner or the owner's agent of critical infrastructure
or a critical system on or near the owner's critical
infrastructure or critical system;
(iv) The use of an unmanned aircraft system by a
law enforcement agency, emergency medical service agency,
hazardous materials response team, disaster management
agency or other emergency management agency for the purpose
of incident command, area reconnaissance, personnel and
equipment deployment monitoring, training or a related
purpose;
(v) The use of an unmanned aircraft system by a
private landowner on property owned by the private
landowner.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0132
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(d) A person who violates subsection (a) or (b) of
this section is guilty of:
(i) A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment not
to exceed six (6) months, a fine not to exceed two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), or both, for a first
offense;
(ii) A felony punishable by imprisonment not to
exceed two (2) years, a fine not to exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000.00), or both, for a second or subsequent
offense.
(e) A peace officer or law enforcement official may
take or authorize the use of reasonable actions to prevent
or stop the use of unmanned aircraft systems or model
aircrafts operating in violation of this section. For
purposes of this subsection, reasonable actions may include
disabling, damaging or removing the unmanned aircraft
system or model aircraft from the prohibited location.
(f) The governor may order the national guard of
Wyoming to assist in taking or using reasonable actions to
prevent or stop the use of unmanned aircraft systems or
model aircrafts operating in violation of this section, in
accordance with W.S. 19-9-207.
(g) The attorney general shall represent Wyoming
national guard members, peace officers or law enforcement
officials in litigation that may commence due to a national
guard member's, peace officer's or law enforcement
official's compliance with subsection (e) or (f) of this
section.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0132
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. W.S. 10-4-303 by creating a new subsection
(d), 19-9-207(a) by creating a new paragraph (iv) and by
renumbering (iv) as (v) and 19-13-501(a) by creating new
paragraphs (vi) through (viii) are amended to read:
10-4-303. Low or dangerous flight; landing on land or
water of another; penalties and remedies.
(d) A person who operates or uses an unmanned
aircraft in a manner that is not lawful under subsection
(a) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months, a
fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00),
or both.
19-9-207. Suppressing tumult; preserving order,
insuring public safety; expenses; creation of additional
units; draft.
(a) The governor may order any designated person or
commanding officer of any military unit to appear with or
without his command at a time and place specified to:
(iv) Prevent or stop the use of unmanned
aircraft systems or model aircrafts violating W.S.
19-13-503;
(iv)(v) Perform such other duties as the
commander in chief may require and which the militia or
national guard may lawfully perform.
19-13-501. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0132
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vi) "Critical system" means any one (1) or more
of the following:
(A) A petroleum refinery;
(B) A petroleum, chemical or rubber
production, transportation, storage or processing facility;
(C) A chemical manufacturing facility;
(D) A water or wastewater treatment
facility and water development, distribution or conveyance
system, including a dam;
(E) An electric generation facility and any
associated substation or switchyard;
(F) An electrical transmission or
distribution substation;
(G) An electrical transmission line of not
less than sixty-nine thousand (69,000) volts;
(H) An electronic communication station or
tower;
(J) An energy control center;
(K) A distribution operating center;
(M) A facility that transfers or
distributes natural gas, including a compressor station,
regulator station, city gate station or pressure-limiting
station or a liquefied natural gas facility or supplier tap
facility;
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0132
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(N) Any railroad infrastructure or
facility;
(O) A federal, state, county, chancery or
municipal court;
(P) A public safety or emergency operation
facility;
(Q) A federal, state, county or municipal
jail or correctional facility or any other facility where
persons are incarcerated;
(R) A federal or state military
installation or facility;
(S) A hospital that receives air ambulance
services;
(T) Any surface, subsurface or in-situ
mining or manufacturing infrastructure or facility;
(U) Any other facility or property deemed
to be a critical infrastructure or critical system by the
governor.
(vii) "Model aircraft" means as defined in
section 336 of the FAA Modernization and Reform Act of
2012, P.L. 112-95;
(viii) "Unmanned aircraft system" means as
defined by W.S. 6-5-214(a)(iii).
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0132
ENROLLED ACT NO. 58, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
7